District of Columbia statutes.
50-607

Penalties.

Any person who shall violate any provision of this chapter or of any regulation promulgated by the Council of the District of Columbia under the authority of this chapter, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or by imprisonment for not more than 6 months, or both. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

History

Apr. 22, 1960, 74 Stat. 73, Pub. L. 86-431, § 8
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 435, 32 DCR 4450
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 264, 60 DCR 2064

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1107.
1973 Ed., § 40-907.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not exceeding $500”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 264 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402 (309 to 316) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.